Hawaii statutes.
§657-3.5 Relation back of amendments.
An amended pleading relates back to the date of the original pleading as
provided by the rules of court.

Nothing herein limits or affects section 657-3.
[L 1972, c 105, §1(c)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next